New York, session 2025-2026, S5080.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 670 of the laws of 2007 amending the 2 education law relating to directing the commissioner of education to 3 promulgate regulations limiting the engines of school vehicles to remain 4 idling while parked or standing on school grounds, as amended by chapter 5 140 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed 7 repealed [June 30, 2029] upon a finding by the commissioner of education 8 that either all school buses and vehicles owned or leased by school 9 districts no longer run on fossil fuels or all such buses and vehicles 10 run on electricity or other alternative fuels with zero emissions; 11 provided that the commissioner of education shall notify the legislative 12 bill drafting commission upon the occurrence of such finding in order 13 that the commissioner may maintain an accurate and timely effective data 14 base of the official text of the laws of the state of New York in furth- 15 erance of effectuating the provisions of section 44 of the legislative 16 law and section 70-b of the public officers law. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09439-01-5